Hawaii, session 2025, SB938.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII: Section 1.  The purpose of this Act is to require that the department of taxation submit an annual report to the legislature to ensure organizational stability and prevent overstaffing within the information technology services offices. SECTION 2.  Chapter 231, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is amended by adding a new section to be appropriately designated and to read as follows: "§231-    Information technology services office; reports.  (a)  The department shall submit a report to the legislature of its findings and recommendations, including any proposed legislation, no later than twenty days prior to the convening of each regular session.  The report shall include: (1)  An organizational chart and staffing plan for the information technology services office; and (2)  Specific requirements for: (A)  Cost considerations; (B)  Budget impact; (C)  Management and oversight; (D)  Recruitment and talent acquisition; (E)  Organizational considerations; (F)  Risk of overstaffing; (G)  Long-term sustainability; (H)  Integration of non-technology services staff; and (I)  Accountability measures for effective use of resources and long-term sustainability." SECTION 3.  New statutory material is underscored. SECTION 4.  This Act shall take effect upon its approval.